Wisconsin, session 2025, AB893.
do enact as follows:AB893,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB893,26Section 2. 20.115 (7) (u) of the statutes is created to read:AB893,2,9720.115 (7) (u) Grants for regional biodigesters. From the environmental fund, 8the amounts in the schedule for providing planning grants for establishing regional 9biodigesters.AB893,310Section 3. 93.74 of the statutes is created to read:AB893,2,131193.74 Grants for regional biodigesters. (1) Grant program. From the 12appropriation under s. 20.115 (7) (u), the department shall provide planning grants 13for establishing regional biodigesters.AB893,2,1514(2) Rules. The department shall promulgate rules for the administration of 15this section.AB893,2,1616